test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-75valama_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - valama: # Verb (75) valama 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     valama+V+Inf/mA: valama
     valama+V+Inf: vallaq
     valama+V+Act+PrfPrc: valanuq
     valama+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [valõt, valõtu]

     valama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vala
     valama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [valat, valadõq]
     valama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [vala, valas]
     valama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: valamiq
     valama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: valatiq
     valama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [valavaq, valasõq]
     valama+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: vala
     valama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vali
     valama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [valit, valiq, validõq]
     valama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vali
     valama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: valimiq
     valama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: valitiq
     valama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [valiq, valivaq]

     valama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: valõda
     valama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [valõtat, valõtadõq]
     valama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: valõtas

     valama+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: vallav

     valama+V+Jus: valaguq
